Utah statutes.
65A-8a-102.    Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Forest practice" means, except as provided in Subsection (1)(b):
(i)  the harvesting of trees;
(ii)  new road construction associated with harvesting or accessing trees;
(iii)  site preparation for regeneration of a timber stand;
(iv)  reforestation; or
(v)  the management of logging slash.
(b)  "Forest practice" does not include:
(i)  the operation of a nursery or Christmas tree farm;
(ii)  the harvest of Christmas trees;
(iii)  the harvest of trees for the noncommercial, personal use by the owner
of forested land from which the trees are harvested; or
(iv)  a harvesting operation encompassing fewer than ten contiguous acres of
forested land.
(2)  "Forested land" means land, except land owned by the federal government,
growing tree species which are, or could be at maturity, capable of furnishing
raw material used in the manufacture of lumber or other forest products.
(3)  "Forest Water Quality Guidelines" means the field-applicable practice
guidelines adopted by the division for use during forestry activities to
protect water quality and contained within a nonpoint source management plan.
(4)  "Landowner" means a person who holds an ownership interest in forested
land.
(5)  "Operator" means a person who:
(a)  is responsible for conducting forest practices; or
(b)  through a contractual agreement with the landowner, is obligated to or
entitled to conduct forest practices or to carry out a timber sale.
